Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1085.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1798.2-E(9), (10) and (11) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, are amended to read:Section 1798.2-E. Motor License Fund.An appropriation from the Motor License Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police is restricted as follows:* * *(9) For fiscal year 2025-2026, the total amount of the appropriation shall not exceed [68% of the total amount appropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2016-2017] $125,000,000.(10) For fiscal year 2026-2027[, the total amount of the appropriation shall not exceed 64% of the total amount appropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2016-2017.] and each fiscal year thereafter, no amount shall be appropriated.[(11) For fiscal year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the total amount of the appropriation shall not exceed the greater of:(i) $500,000,000; or(ii) 60% of the total amount appropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2016-2017.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1085PN1188 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728